test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-INTR-IPFV_REP-0-tsazid_wake-up_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Verb - ts'ázid[wake-up] :
    ts'ázid[wake-up]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjSg1:       ts'ánásshiizh
    ts'ázid[wake-up]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjSg2:       ts'ánánizhiizh
    ts'ázid[wake-up]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjSg3:       ts'ánázhiizh
    ts'ázid[wake-up]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjPl1:       [ts'ánáasiìzhiizh, ts'ánáasaàzhiizh]
    ts'ázid[wake-up]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjPl1+Distr: [ts'ánádààsiìzhiizh, ts'ánádààsaàzhiizh]
    ts'ázid[wake-up]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjPl2:       ts'ánásshiizh
    ts'ázid[wake-up]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjPl2+Distr: ts'ánádàsshiizh
    ts'ázid[wake-up]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjPl3:       ts'ánágizhiizh
    ts'ázid[wake-up]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjPl3+Distr: ts'ánádàgizhiizh
    ts'ázid[wake-up]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjSg4:       ts'ánáts'izhiizh
    ts'ázid[wake-up]+V+I+Ipfv+Rep+SbjSg4+Distr: ts'ánádàts'izhiizh
